Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-213
Village chief of police; powers and duties.

The village chief of police shall have power to make or order an arrest with proper process for any offense against the laws of the state or ordinances of the village and bring the offender to trial before the proper officer and to arrest without process in all cases where any such offense shall be committed or attempted to be committed in his or her presence.

Laws 1885, c. 18, § 1, p. 160;

R.S.1913, § 5063;

C.S.1922, § 4235;

C.S.1929, § 17-213;

R.S.1943, § 17-213;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 106;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 76.

Ticket quota requirements, prohibited, see section 48-235.

Village marshal is not an employee within the meaning of workmen's compensation law. Suverkrubbe v. Village of Fort Calhoun, 127 Neb. 472, 256 N.W. 47 (1934).